Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB322.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 205.2003 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall promulgate[by] administrative regulations in accordance
with[subject to the provisions of] KRS Chapter 13A to develop a work program for
recipients of public assistance under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act
to provide for immediate employment or preparation for employment.
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 3/2/2026 11:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2467
(2) The self-sufficiency of participants shall be the primary goal of the work program.[
] Participants shall bear the ultimate responsibility in pursuit of this goal.
(3) In partnership with participants, the cabinet shall assess their strengths and needs
and provide supportive services to assist in the pursuit of work and self-sufficiency.
(4) The cabinet shall:
(a) Develop and implement initiatives under Kentucky's Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program Employment and Training state plan,
established in accordance with 7 C.F.R. sec. 273.7, to promote improved
employment outcomes and workforce participation. The initiatives shall:
1. Be related to healthy workforce habits among eligible individuals;
2. Include establishing partnerships with public and private entities,
including but not limited to workforce boards, educational institutions,
employers, and community organizations;
3. Include partner-funded programs supporting household food security
and improved nutrition, including but not limited to an incentive
program for the purpose of increasing the purchase and consumption
of nutritious foods both at work and at home;
4. Include job readiness, occupational training, and work-based learning
opportunities;
5. Implement employment assessment and individualized employment
planning; and
6. Include case management and employment navigation services;
(b) To the extent allowable by federal law, utilize federal Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program matching grant funds as provided in 7 C.F.R.
sec. 273.7(d);
(c) On or before December 1, 2026, pursue any federal approvals necessary to
implement the initiatives, including a submission of a state plan amendment
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 3/2/2026 11:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2467
to Kentucky's federally approved Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program Employment and Training state plan; and
(d) Submit a report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the
Interim Joint Committee on Health Services and appear before the Interim
Joint Committee on Health Services annually to update the members of the
committee regarding program participation levels, employment outcomes,
healthy workforce outcomes, federal fund draw downs, and program
impacts.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 3/2/2026 11:40 AM Jacketed